Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4101
Definitions, where found.

For the purposes of sections 44-4101 to 44-4113, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 44-4102 to 44-4107 shall be used.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 473, § 5.